Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska23-174.04
County zoning; cities of the primary class; planning department; planning director.

In every county in which is located a city of the primary class, there shall be created a planning department, which shall consist of a county planning commission, a planning director, and such subordinate employees as are required to administer the planning program set forth in sections 23-174.01 to 23-174.09. The planning director shall serve as the secretary of the county planning commission and as the administrative head of the planning department.

Laws 1961, c. 87, § 9, p. 304.